Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2065.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4009 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall reimburse providers for
Current Procedural Terminology codes 87636 and 87637 under the
Oklahoma Medicaid program to support multiplex respiratory PCR
testing for symptomatic patients for emergency room and urgent care
settings. These tests are critical for diagnosing respiratory
illnesses such as COVID-19, influenza A or B, and respiratory
syncytial virus (RSV), and align with clinical best practices for
patient care.
Req. No. 11722 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11722 TJ 01/01/25





















Req. No. 11722 Page 2